Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 2. Operation of Vehicles Generally

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

8 Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 427 to 1041.

What amounts to reckless driving within statute making reckless driving of automobile a criminal offense, 52 ALR2d 1337.

Motor vehicle operator's liability for accident occurring while driving with vision obscured by smoke or steam, 32 ALR4th 933.

Automobiles: liability for U-turn collisions, 53 ALR4th 849.

Validity, construction and effect of statutes or ordinances forbidding automotive “cruising” — practice of driving repeatedly through loop of public roads through city, 87 ALR4th 1110.

60 C.J.S. Motor Vehicles §§ 42 to 68.

§ 31-5-201.
Driving on right side of roadway; exceptions.

Upon all roadways of sufficient width a vehicle shall be driven upon the right half of the roadway, except as follows:

When overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction under the rules governing the movement;

When a stationary obstruction exists making it necessary to drive to the left of the center of the highway but any person so doing shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles traveling in the proper direction upon the unobstructed portion of the highway within such distance as to constitute an immediate hazard;

Upon a roadway divided into three (3) marked lanes for traffic under the rules applicable thereon; or

Upon a roadway designated and signposted for one-way traffic.

Upon all roadways except one-way streets any vehicle proceeding at less than the normal speed of traffic at the time and place and under the conditions then existing shall be driven in the right-hand lane then available for traffic, or as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway, except when overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction or when preparing for a left turn at an intersection or into an alley, private road or driveway.

Upon any roadway having four (4) or more lanes for moving traffic and providing for two-way movement of traffic, no vehicle shall be driven to the left of the center line of the roadway except when authorized by official traffic-control devices designating certain lanes to the left side of the center of the roadway for use by traffic not otherwise permitted to use the lanes, or except as permitted under paragraph (a)(ii) of this section. This subsection does not prohibit the crossing of the center line in making a left turn into or from an alley, private road or driveway.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 43; C.S. 1945, § 60-643; W.S. 1957, § 31-99; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Stationary obstruction on roadway. —

The exception to the rule that vehicles must be driven on the right half of the roadway, which provides that a vehicle may be driven to the left of the center of the highway in order to avoid a stationary obstruction, applies only to situations where a driver is forced to enter a lane of opposing traffic in order to avoid an obstruction in his lane, and does not apply to situations where a driver is forced to move into another lane of traffic moving in the same direction. Sellers v. Dooley Oil Transp., 2001 WY 44, 22 P.3d 307,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2001).

Presence of car on left constitutes evidence of negligence.—

Presence of car on left side of road, in absence of other excusing or justifying facts, constitutes evidence of negligence. Wallis v. Nauman, 61 Wyo. 231, 157 P.2d 285,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1945).

Skidding across centerline. —

Motorist's failure to keep vehicle to right of center of highway is excused where, without his fault, vehicle skids across centerline, but where skidding results from his negligence, unavoidable accident doctrine may not be invoked to avoid liability. Wallis v. Nauman, 61 Wyo. 231, 157 P.2d 285,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1945).

Where section violated, proximate cause deemed decisive factor.—

In a case involving a violation of this section, it is immaterial whether a violation of a traffic regulation constitutes negligence per se or only evidence of negligence. The decisive factor is whether such a violation contributes to and is the proximate cause of the injury suffered. Grayson v. Williams, 256 F.2d 61, 1958 U.S. App. LEXIS 4930 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1958).

Driving on left held proximate cause of accident. —

See Johnston v. Wortham Mach. Co., 60 Wyo. 301, 151 P.2d 89,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1944).

Overtaking driver assumes safe passing absent contrary warning.—

Where a passing attempt is undertaken on a “completely straight” portion of the road, the driver is entitled to assume that the passing lane may be used with safety in the absence of any warning from the vehicle being passed. Campbell v. W. S. Hatch Co., 622 P.2d 944,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 280

(Wyo. 1981).

Cited

in

State v. Rideout, 450 P.2d 452,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1969); Woodard v. Driscoll, 492 P.2d 1327,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 219

(Wyo. 1972).

§ 31-5-202.
Passing of vehicle approaching from opposite direction.

Drivers of vehicles proceeding in opposite directions shall pass each other to the right and upon roadways having width for not more than one (1) line of traffic in each direction each driver shall give to the other at least one-half (1/2) of the main-traveled portion of the roadway as nearly as possible.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 44; C.S. 1945, § 60-644; W.S. 1957, § 31-100; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Section applicable to vehicles engaged in highway work. —

Operative effect of language of statute governing meeting and passing of vehicles was not abrogated or affected by provision (§

31-5-105

) that Motor Vehicle Traffic Code shall not apply to vehicles while actually engaged in work on surface of highway. Johnston v. Wortham Mach. Co., 60 Wyo. 301, 151 P.2d 89,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1944) (decided under prior law).

Travelers may drive upon other side of road to prevent accidents.—

The statute requiring a driver to turn promptly to the right of the center of the road upon meeting another vehicle traveling in the opposite direction is subject to an exception permitting travelers to drive upon the other side, if so doing is likely to prevent rather than cause the accidents which it is the purpose of the statute to prevent. Marvel v. Pursel, 65 Wyo. 395, 202 P.2d 656,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1949) (decided under prior law).

Driver acting in emergency not negligent. —

If a court finds that the driver in an emergency, with only a few seconds to decide, acted according to her best judgment, she is not guilty of negligence. Wells v. McKenzie, 50 Wyo. 412, 62 P.2d 305,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1936).

Right to assume approaching car will turn to right. —

A driver may assume that a car traveling on the left side of the road will turn to the right side in time to avoid a collision. O'Malley v. Eagan, 43 Wyo. 233, 2 P.2d 1063,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 43 Wyo. 350, 5 P.2d 276,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1931); Hill v. Walters, 55 Wyo. 334, 100 P.2d 98,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1940).

In the absence of any special circumstance, the user of a road may reasonably expect the driver of an oncoming vehicle to observe and comply with the statutory law of the road. It is the duty of the driver of the approaching vehicle to turn to his right of the center of the road and, ordinarily, drivers are entitled to rely upon compliance with that duty. McVicker v. Kuronen, 71 Wyo. 222, 256 P.2d 111,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1953).

No liability unless violation of legal duty proximately causesinjury. —

A driver's violation of his legal duty on the highway does not necessarily carry with it liability for injury caused by his automobile, since to incur liability a violation must have been proximate cause of the injury complained of. Hester v. Coliseum Motor Co., 41 Wyo. 345, 285 P. 781,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1930).

Evidence of custom of yielding right-of-way to loaded vehicleadmissible in damage action. —

In an action for damages arising out of a collision between a loaded truck and an empty truck on a dirt road, it is proper to admit testimony that it is the custom, known to both drivers and previously adhered to by them, for the driver of an empty truck to yield the right-of-way to the driver of a loaded truck so as to permit the loaded truck to proceed on the wrong side of the road in order to avoid holes or soft spots in the road. Such evidence is admissible, not to prove that by virtue of custom a right-of-way was established contrary to the right-of-way given by statute, but because it is a circumstance having direct bearing on the question of negligence. McVicker v. Kuronen, 71 Wyo. 222, 256 P.2d 111,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1953).

Negligence shown. —

See Pierce v. Bean, 57 Wyo. 189, 115 P.2d 660,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1941); Wallis v. Nauman, 61 Wyo. 231, 157 P.2d 285,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1945); Kaan v. Kuhn, 64 Wyo. 158, 187 P.2d 138,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1947).

Evidence did not establish negligence

in driver's failure to stop before collision with car on wrong side of road. — See O'Malley v. Eagan, 43 Wyo. 233, 2 P.2d 1063,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 43 Wyo. 350, 5 P.2d 276,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1931).

Use of section in connection with instruction to jury. —

See Goich v. State, 80 Wyo. 179, 339 P.2d 119,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1959).

Quoted

in

Article Eight. Roberts v. Estate of Randall, 2002 WY 115, 51 P.3d 204,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Rights, duties and liability with respect to narrow bridge or passage as between motor vehicles approaching from opposite directions, 47 ALR2d 142.

§ 31-5-203.
Rules governing overtaking on the left.

The following rules shall govern the overtaking and passing of vehicles proceeding in the same direction, subject to those limitations, exceptions and special rules hereinafter stated and those contained in subsection (c) of this section:

The driver of a vehicle overtaking another vehicle proceeding in the same direction shall pass to the left thereof at a safe distance and shall not again drive to the right side of the roadway until safely clear of the overtaken vehicle;

Except when overtaking and passing on the right is permitted, the driver of an overtaken vehicle shall give way to the right in favor of the overtaking vehicle on audible signal and shall not increase the speed of his vehicle until completely passed by the overtaking vehicle.

A driver of a passenger car, motorcycle, autocycle or pickup truck, not towing any other vehicle, may exceed the speed limit by up to ten (10) miles an hour while passing another vehicle traveling at less than the legal maximum speed, in order to safely pass the vehicle. The overtaking vehicle shall return to the right-hand lane and reduce speed to the posted speed limit as soon as practicable. This subsection shall be applicable only upon roadways divided into two (2) lanes for two (2) way movement of traffic and where the posted speed limit is fifty (50) miles per hour or greater. This subsection shall not be applicable in construction zones. Passing a vehicle pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to all other applicable motor vehicle laws. A driver of a vehicle exceeding the ten (10) mile per hour limitation of this subsection shall be subject to the full penalty or penalties applicable to exceeding the posted speed limit by the actual speed of the vehicle. As used in this section, “motorcycle,” “passenger car,” “pickup,” “autocycle” and vehicle” mean as defined in W.S.

31-1-101

.

The driver of a motor vehicle overtaking and passing a bicycle or electric bicycle, which is operating lawfully, proceeding in the same direction shall, when space allows, maintain at least a three (3) foot separation between the right side of the driver’s motor vehicle, including all mirrors and other projections from the motor vehicle, and the bicycle or electric bicycle.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 45; C.S. 1945, § 60-645; W.S. 1957, § 31-101; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2012, ch. 70, § 1; 2015 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 165, § 1, effective March 6, 2017; 2019 ch. 95, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added (b).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added “and those contained in subsection (c) of this section” to the introductory language in (a), and added a new subsection (c).

The 2017 amendment

added “autocycle” near the beginning and near the end, and made related changes.

Laws 2017, ch. 165, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2017.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (c), added "or electric bicycle" twice.

Applicability of section. —

This section has applicability where the driver of the overtaking vehicle has reason to believe the forward vehicle will move into the passing lane. Campbell v. W. S. Hatch Co., 622 P.2d 944,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 280

(Wyo. 1981).

Overtaking driver assumes safe passing absent warning. —

Where a driver's passing attempt is undertaken on a “completely straight” portion of the road, he is entitled to assume that the passing lane may be used with safety in the absence of any warning from the vehicle being passed. Campbell v. W. S. Hatch Co., 622 P.2d 944,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 280

(Wyo. 1981).

And he needs to sound horn only if reasonably necessary for safe operation.

Campbell v. W. S. Hatch Co., 622 P.2d 944,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 280

(Wyo. 1981).

Passing driver obligated to ensure passing lane clear. —

If a person desires to pass another through a dust cloud it is his sole duty to ensure that the passing lane is clear before passing. England v. Simmons, 728 P.2d 1137,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 660

(Wyo. 1986).

Overtaken vehicle need not give way unless audibly signaled.—

This section fixes no obligation upon the operator of the overtaken vehicle to give way to the right in favor of the overtaking vehicle, except “on audible signal.” Blakeman v. Gopp, 364 P.2d 986,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1961).

This section only requires the driver of an overtaken vehicle to give way to the right in favor of the overtaking vehicle on audible signal. Jack v. Browne, 410 P.2d 578,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1966).

Circumstances where driver may be negligent for not sounding horn prior to passing

include: (1) situations in which the overtaking vehicle intrudes into the lane occupied by the forward vehicle; (2) situations in which the overtaking driver might expect the forward vehicle to meander due to wind or due to the immaturity of the forward driver; and (3) situations in which the forward driver is likely to be surprised by the pass, e.g., because the overtaking vehicle is passing illegally, or because the forward driver is only a child or because the overtaking vehicle approaches rapidly from behind. Campbell v. W. S. Hatch Co., 622 P.2d 944,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 280

(Wyo. 1981).

Suit properly dismissed where overtaking driver failed to blowhorn. —

A suit for damages arising out of a collision of two cars is properly dismissed where the evidence shows that the overtaking driver failed to blow his horn prior to attempting to pass a car proceeding in the same direction, and that the accident would not have occurred if the driver had blown his horn. Fink v. Lewark, 70 Wyo. 150, 246 P.2d 195,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1952).

Safe distance at which automobile should pass bicycle from rear depends on circumstances

and variations from perfectly straight driving or riding which may be anticipated from ordinarily careful persons. Blakeman v. Gopp, 364 P.2d 986,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1961).

And is jury question. —

Whether a motorist was negligent in failure to use reasonable care to pass sufficiently far to the left of a bicycle is for the jury or trier of the fact. Blakeman v. Gopp, 364 P.2d 986,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1961).

Violation of provisions evidence of reckless intent. —

Evidence that the defendant violated §§

31-5-115

, 31-5-210(a) and

31-5-301

and subsection (a)(i) of this section could form a basis for the conclusion that the defendant was driving in a manner that he knew, or should have known, was highly dangerous to others and that he did so intentionally, or heedlessly, with a careless indifference to the consequences. Harvey v. State, 596 P.2d 1386,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 428

(Wyo. 1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Rights and liabilities as between drivers of motor vehicles proceeding in same direction, where one or both attempt to pass on left of another vehicle so proceeding, 27 ALR2d 317.

Duty and liability of overtaken driver with respect to adjusting speed to that of passing vehicle, 91 ALR2d 1260.

Duty and liability with respect to giving audible signal before passing, 22 ALR3d 325.

§ 31-5-204.
General limitations on overtaking on the left.

No vehicle shall be driven to the left side of the center of the roadway in overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction unless the left side is clearly visible and is free of oncoming traffic for a sufficient distance ahead to permit the overtaking and passing to be completely made without interfering with the operation of any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction or any vehicle overtaken. In every event the overtaking vehicle must return to an authorized lane of travel as soon as practicable and in the event the passing movement involves the use of a lane authorized for vehicles approaching from the opposite direction, before coming within two hundred (200) feet of any approaching vehicle.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 47; C.S. 1945, § 60-647; W.S. 1957, § 31-102; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Motorist may drive to left in order to avoid accident. —

This section and §

31-5-205

are not intended to and do not prohibit a motorist from driving to the left of the center of the highway or street in trying, in an emergency, to avoid an accident. In case of an emergency it may be not only excusable but perfectly proper for an automobilist to turn to the left side of the road in order to escape from danger or avoid injuring others. Dallason v. Buckmeier, 74 Wyo. 125, 284 P.2d 386,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1955).

And when clear view. —

Where there is a clear view, it is not negligence to drive in the center of the highway, or even on the opposite side, but, in rounding a curve or approaching the summit of a hill, where the view is shortened, it is the driver's duty to keep on the right side. Dallason v. Buckmeier, 74 Wyo. 125, 284 P.2d 386,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1955) (see §

31-5-205

).

Passing driver obligated to ensure passing lane clear. —

If a person desires to pass another through a dust cloud it is his sole duty to ensure that the passing lane is clear before passing. England v. Simmons, 728 P.2d 1137,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 660

(Wyo. 1986).

§ 31-5-205.
Additional limitations on driving on the left; exceptions.

No vehicle shall be driven on the left side of the roadway under the following conditions:

When approaching or upon the crest of a grade or a curve in the highway where the driver’s view is obstructed within such distance as to create a hazard in the event another vehicle might approach from the opposite direction;

When approaching within one hundred (100) feet of or traversing any intersection or railroad grade crossing unless otherwise indicated by official traffic-control devices;

When the view is obstructed upon approaching within one hundred (100) feet of any bridge, viaduct or tunnel.

Subsection (a) of this section does not apply:

Upon a one-way roadway;

Under the conditions described in W.S. 31-5-201(a)(ii);

To the driver of a vehicle turning left into or from an alley, private road or driveway.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 48; C.S. 1945, § 60-648; W.S. 1957, § 31-103; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Lane deviation warranted traffic stop. —

Substantial evidence supported the Office of Administrative Hearings'
(OAH) decision to uphold the suspension of the driver's license for failing to submit to chemical testing pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

31-6-102

because: (1) the trooper stated that he saw the driver's vehicle cross over the center line and the fog line more than once; and (2) the OAH reviewed the DVD of the incident, which showed the vehicle drifting from one side of lane to the other more than once and therefore corroborated the trooper's statements, even though it did not depict clearly whether the vehicle crossed over the lines due to its poor quality and limited duration. Taken together, the trooper's report and the DVD constituted relevant evidence from which a reasonable mind could conclude that the trooper had probable cause to stop the vehicle for a traffic violation, namely driving under the influence or failing to drive within the lanes.
Tiernan v. State, DOT, 2011 WY 143, 262 P.3d 561,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2011), overruled in part, Allgier v. State, 2015 WY 137, 358 P.3d 1271,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 2015).

Applied

in

Lake v. D & L Langley Trucking, Inc., 2010 WY 75, 233 P.3d 589,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(June 9, 2010).

Quoted

in

Article Eight. Roberts v. Estate of Randall, 2002 WY 115, 51 P.3d 204,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2002).

Stated

in

Sellers v. Dooley Oil Transp., 2001 WY 44, 22 P.3d 307,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2001).

Cited

in

State v. Rideout, 450 P.2d 452,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1969).

§ 31-5-206.
Overtaking on the right.

The driver of a vehicle may overtake and pass upon the right of another vehicle only under the following conditions:

When the vehicle overtaken is making or about to make a left turn;

Upon a roadway with unobstructed pavement of sufficient width for two (2) or more lines of vehicles moving lawfully in the direction being traveled by the overtaking vehicle.

The driver of a vehicle may overtake and pass another vehicle upon the right only under conditions permitting the movement in safety. The movement shall not be made by driving off the roadway.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 46; C.S. 1945, § 60-646; W.S. 1957, § 31-104; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Cited

in

Hodges v. State, 904 P.2d 334,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1995).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Operation of statutory regulations where driver of motor vehicle attempts to pass on right of other motor vehicle proceeding in same direction, 38 ALR2d 114.

§ 31-5-207.
No-passing zones.

The superintendent and local authorities may determine those portions of any highway under their respective jurisdictions where overtaking and passing or driving on the left of the roadway would be especially hazardous and may by appropriate signs or markings on the roadway indicate the beginning and end of such zones and when the signs or markings are in place and clearly visible to an ordinarily observant person every driver of a vehicle shall obey the directions thereof.

Where signs or markings are in place to define a no-passing zone as set forth in subsection (a) of this section no driver shall drive on the left side of the roadway within a no-passing zone or on the left side of any pavement striping designed to mark a no-passing zone throughout its length.

This section does not apply under the conditions described in W.S. 31-5-201(a)(ii) nor to the driver of a vehicle turning left into or from any alley, private road or driveway.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 49; C.S. 1945, § 60-649; W.S. 1957, § 31-105; Laws 1971, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Applicability. —

The statute is intended to apply only to roadways on which traffic runs in two directions; it is inapplicable to a multi-lane, one-way roadway. Sellers v. Dooley Oil Transp., 2001 WY 44, 22 P.3d 307,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2001).

Jury determines whether no-passing zone violation constitutesnegligence. —

A court properly should leave the determination to the jury whether a no-passing zone violation, considered with all the surrounding circumstances, constituted negligence that was a proximate cause of the accident. Kinnison v. Houghton, 432 F.2d 1274, 1970 U.S. App. LEXIS 6701 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1970).

§ 31-5-208.
One-way roadways and rotary traffic islands.

The superintendent and local authorities with respect to highways under their respective jurisdictions may designate any highway, roadway, part of a roadway or specific lanes upon which vehicular traffic shall proceed in one (1) direction at all or such times as is indicated by official traffic-control devices.

Upon a roadway so designated for one-way traffic a vehicle shall be driven only in the direction designated at all or such times as indicated by official traffic-control devices.

A vehicle passing around a rotary traffic island shall be driven only to the right of the island.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 50; C.S. 1945, § 60-650; W.S. 1957, § 31-106; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-209.
Driving on roadways laned for traffic.

Whenever any roadway has been divided into two (2) or more clearly marked lanes for traffic the following rules in addition to all others consistent herewith shall apply:

A vehicle shall be driven as nearly as practicable entirely within a single lane and shall not be moved from the lane until the driver has first ascertained that the movement can be made with safety;

Upon a roadway which is divided into three (3) lanes and provides for two-way movement of traffic, a vehicle shall not be driven in the center lane except when overtaking and passing another vehicle traveling in the same direction when the center lane is clear of traffic within a safe distance, or in preparation for making or completing a left turn or where the center lane is at the time allocated exclusively to traffic moving in the direction the vehicle is proceeding and the allocation is designated by official traffic-control devices;

Official traffic-control devices may be erected directing specified traffic to use a designated lane or designating those lanes to be used by traffic moving in a particular direction regardless of the center of the roadway and drivers of vehicles shall obey the directions of every such device;

Official traffic-control devices may be installed prohibiting the changing of lanes on sections of roadways and drivers of vehicles shall obey the directions of every such device.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 51; C.S. 1945, § 60-651; W.S. 1957, § 31-107; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Probable cause for traffic stop.

State trooper’s decision to stop defendant’s vehicle was supported by reasonable suspicion because the trooper observed defendant’s vehicle twice cross over the center line of a highway when the weather was clear, the sun was setting, and the roads were dry. Elmore v. State, 2021 WY 41, 482 P.3d 358,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 2021).

Lane deviation warranted traffic stop. —

Evidence demonstrated requisite probable cause for officer to stop defendant for traffic violation (driving in more than one lane of traffic on four-lane city street, in violation of subsection (a)(i)). — See Norman v. State, 747 P.2d 520,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 563

(Wyo. 1987), reh'g denied,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. Jan. 12, 1988).

Trial court properly denied defendant's motion to suppress evidence of marijuana that was found in defendant's vehicle because defendant's one-time lane deviation, which was extensive, both in time and distance, constituted a statutory violation, and thus warranted a traffic stop; the deviation was eight inches over the fog line for approximately 550 feet.
Dods v. State, 2010 WY 133, 240 P.3d 1208,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2010).

Probable cause for traffic stop. —

Where appellant's license was suspended following his arrest for driving while under the influence of alcohol, the record contained substantial evidence to show the deputy had probable cause to stop appellant for violating this section because his report stated that appellant's truck went across the centerline and the fog line before regaining a single lane of travel. The lane violations were also shown on a DVD.
Espinoza v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT, 2012 WY 101, 280 P.3d 1226,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 2012), overruled in part, Allgier v. State, 2015 WY 137, 358 P.3d 1271,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 2015).

Quoted

in

Oberson v. Shreeve, 672 P.2d 1294,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 395

(Wyo. 1983).

Cited

in

Hittner v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT (In re Hittner), 2008 WY 91, 189 P.3d 872,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Aug. 1, 2008).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Negligence of motorist as to injury or damage occasioned in avoiding collision with vehicle approaching in wrong lane, 47 ALR2d 119.

§ 31-5-210.
Following too closely.

The driver of a vehicle shall not follow another vehicle more closely than is reasonable and prudent, having due regard for the speed of the vehicles and the traffic upon and the condition of the highway.

The driver of any vehicle when traveling upon a roadway outside of a business or residence district, and which is following another vehicle shall, whenever conditions permit, leave sufficient space so that an overtaking vehicle may enter and occupy the space without danger.

Motor vehicles being driven upon any roadway outside of a business or residence district in a caravan or motorcade whether or not towing other vehicles shall be so operated as to allow sufficient space between each vehicle or combination of vehicles so as to enable any other vehicle to enter and occupy such space without danger. This provision shall not apply to funeral processions.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 52; C.S. 1945, § 60-652; W.S. 1957, § 31-107; Laws 1973, ch. 194, § 2; 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Traffic stop unreasonable. —

Because a traffic violation for following too closely was not objectively justified and was unreasonable at its inception, the traffic stop violated the constitution, and the district court erred in denying defendant’s motion to suppress evidence obtained from the search of a vehicle following the stop; the trooper’s objective justification for a traffic violation was negated, and the traffic stop was unreasonable when without personally observing any traffic violation, he followed the vehicle. Levenson v. State, 2022 WY 51, 508 P.3d 229,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2022).

Investigatory stop of vehicle was warranted.

—

Defendant was not seized in violation of the Fourth Amendment when a trooper stopped him for following another vehicle too closely because the trooper developed reasonable suspicion that defendant was following a semi-truck too closely by using the two-second rule to measure the distance between the two vehicles multiple times; an officer can develop reasonable suspicion that a driver is following another vehicle too closely without resorting to such a complex method. Robinson v. State, 2019 WY 125, 454 P.3d 149,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2019).

Section extends to every person or vehicle reasonably affordedprotection. —

This section was enacted for the protection of every person or vehicle which would reasonably be afforded a measure of protection by the enforcement of the terms thereof. Zanetti Bus Lines v. Logan, 400 P.2d 482,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1965).

And nothing contained in section would indicate any intention to restrict its application.

Zanetti Bus Lines v. Logan, 400 P.2d 482,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1965).

Plaintiff may rely on a violation of this section as evidence of negligence

where the plaintiff will reasonably be afforded a measure of protection by the enforcement of the terms thereof. Kinnison v. Houghton, 432 F.2d 1274, 1970 U.S. App. LEXIS 6701 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1970).

Violation of provisions evidence of reckless intent. —

Evidence that the defendant violated §§

31-5-115

, 31-5-203(a)(i) and

31-5-301

and subsection (a) of this section could form a basis for the conclusion that the defendant was driving in a manner that he knew, or should have known, was highly dangerous to others and that he did so intentionally, or heedlessly, with a careless indifference to the consequences. Harvey v. State, 596 P.2d 1386,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 428

(Wyo. 1979).

Investigatory stop of vehicle was warranted. —

Officer's observation of a driver tailgating a semi truck for approximately one-half of a mile, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 31-5-210(a), -1201(a), provided probable cause to initiate a traffic stop; the initial stop did not violate Wyo. Const. art. I, § 4.
Yoeuth v. State, 2009 WY 61, 206 P.3d 1278,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2009).

Denial of defendants'
motion to suppress was proper because Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

31-5-210

prohibited following another vehicle more closely, the trooper testified that he saw defendants following a truck at less than one vehicle length behind, and there was nothing in the record warranting a conclusion that the district court's credibility determination or finding of probable cause was clearly erroneous or contrary to law. Thus, the initial stop was reasonable and did not violate Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 4 or U.S. Const. amend. IV.
Phelps v. State, 2012 WY 87, 278 P.3d 1148,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2012), overruled in part, Allgier v. State, 2015 WY 137, 358 P.3d 1271,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 2015).

Initial stop of the vehicle in which defendant was a passenger and in which marijuana was found did not violate defendant's constitutional rights because the state trooper had reasonable suspicion that the driver of the vehicle was breaking the law by following another vehicle too closely as the trooper testified that there was very little space between the vehicles on the highway and that if something were to have happened, there would have been little reaction time. Allgier v. State, 2015 WY 137, 358 P.3d 1271,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 2015).

Applied

in

Campbell v. W.S. Hatch Co., 622 P.2d 944,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 280

(Wyo. 1981).

Quoted

in

Combined Ins. Co. of Am. v. Sinclair, 584 P.2d 1034,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1978); Article Eight. Roberts v. Estate of Randall, 2002 WY 115, 51 P.3d 204,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Driver's failure to maintain proper distance from motor vehicle ahead, 85 ALR2d 613.

Liability for injury or damages resulting from operation of vehicle in funeral procession or in procession which is claimed to have such legal status, 52 ALR5th 155.

§ 31-5-211.
Driving on divided highways.

Whenever any highway has been divided into two (2) or more roadways by leaving an intervening space or by a physical barrier or clearly indicated dividing section so constructed as to impede vehicular traffic, every vehicle shall be driven only upon the right-hand roadway unless directed or permitted to use another roadway by official traffic-control devices or police officers. No vehicle shall be driven over, across or within any dividing space, barrier or section except through an opening in the physical barrier or dividing section or space or at a cross-over or intersection as established, unless specifically permitted by public authority.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 53; C.S. 1945, § 60-653; W.S. 1957, § 31-109; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-212.
Driving onto or from controlled-access highways.

No person shall drive a vehicle onto or from any controlled-access highway except at such entrances and exits as are established by public authority.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 54; C.S. 1945, § 60-654; W.S. 1957, § 31-110; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-213.
Restrictions on use of controlled-access highways.

The department may by rule or regulation, and local authorities may by ordinance, with respect to any controlled-access highway under their respective jurisdictions prohibit or regulate the use of the highway by any class or kind of traffic which is found to be incompatible with the normal and safe movement of traffic.

The department or the local authority adopting any prohibitory regulation under subsection (a) of this section shall erect and maintain official traffic-control devices on the controlled-access highway on which the regulations are applicable and when so erected no person shall disobey the restrictions stated on the devices.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 55; C.S. 1945, § 60-655; W.S. 1957, § 31-111; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

§ 31-5-214.
Required position and method of turning at intersections.

The driver of a vehicle intending to turn shall do so as follows:

Right turns: Both the approach for a right turn and a right turn shall be made as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway;

Left turns: The driver of a vehicle intending to turn left shall approach the turn in the extreme left-hand lane lawfully available to traffic moving in the direction of travel of the vehicle. Whenever practicable the left turn shall be made to the left of the center of the intersection and so as to leave the intersection or other location in the extreme left-hand lane lawfully available to traffic moving in the same direction as the vehicle on the roadway being entered;

Two-way left turn lanes: Where a special lane for making left turns by drivers proceeding in opposite directions has been indicated by official traffic-control devices:

A left turn shall not be made from any other lane;

A vehicle shall not be driven in the lane except when preparing for making a left turn from or onto the roadway or when preparing for a U-turn when otherwise permitted by law.

The highway department and local authorities in their respective jurisdictions may cause official traffic-control devices to be placed and thereby require and direct that a different course from that specified in this section be traveled by turning vehicles and when the devices are so placed no driver shall turn a vehicle other than as directed and required by the devices.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 56; C.S. 1945, § 60-656; W.S. 1957, § 31-112; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for accident arising from motorist's failure to give signal for right turn, 38 ALR2d 143.

Construction, applicability and effect of traffic regulation prohibiting vehicles from passing one another at street or highway intersection, 53 ALR2d 850.

Duty and liability of vehicle drivers approaching intersection of one-way street with other street, 62 ALR2d 275.

Power to restrict or interfere with access of abutter by traffic regulations, 73 ALR2d 689.

Motorist's liability for collision at intersection of ordinary and arterial highways as affected by absence, displacement or malfunctioning of stop sign or other traffic signal, 74 ALR2d 242.

Motor vehicle accidents involving right turns from lane other than right-hand lane, 7 ALR3d 282.

What is street intersection within traffic statute or regulations, 7 ALR3d 1204.

Accidents arising from merger of traffic on limited access highway with that from service road or ramp, 40 ALR3d 1429.